Illinois, session 104th, SB1555.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 514-3.01 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/14-3.01)  (from Ch. 122, par. 14-3.01)7    Sec. 14-3.01. Advisory Council. This amendatory Act of 81998, in compliance with the reauthorization of IDEA in 1997, 9makes changes in the membership and responsibilities of the 10Advisory Council on the Education of Children with 11Disabilities. The Council shall provide advice and policy 12guidance to the Governor, General Assembly, and the State 13Board of Education with respect to special education and 14related services for children with disabilities. The State 15Board of Education shall seek the advice of the Advisory 16Council regarding all rules and regulations related to the 17education of children with disabilities that are to be 18promulgated by the State Board of Education. The State Board 19of Education shall seek the advice of the Advisory Council on 20modifications or additions to comprehensive plans submitted 21under Section 14-4.01. The Council shall consider any rule or 22regulation or plan submitted to it by the State Board of 23Education within 60 days after its receipt by the chairperson   SB1555 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10971 LNS 21053 b1of the Council.2    Additionally, the Advisory Council shall: (1) advise the 3General Assembly, the Governor, and the State Board of 4Education on unmet needs in the education of children with 5disabilities; (2) assist the State Board of Education in 6developing evaluations and reporting on data to the United 7States Secretary of Education; (3) advise the State Board of 8Education relative to qualifications for hearing officers and 9the rules and procedures for hearings conducted under Section 1014-8.02 or 14-8.02a; (4) comment publicly on any rules or 11regulations proposed by the State regarding the education of 12children with disabilities and the procedures for distribution 13of funds under this Act; (5) advise the State Board of 14Education in developing corrective action plans to address 15findings identified in federal monitoring reports pursuant to 16the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act; (6) advise 17State and local education agencies regarding educational 18programs and materials that may be provided to children with 19disabilities to enable them to fully exercise their 20constitutional and legal rights and entitlements as citizens, 21including those afforded under the Federal Rehabilitation Act 22of 1973, as amended, and the Illinois Human Rights Act; and (7) 23advise the State Board of Education in developing and 24implementing policies relating to the coordination of services 25for children with disabilities.26    The Council shall be composed of 28 27 members, including   SB1555 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10971 LNS 21053 b123 voting members appointed by the Governor and 5 4 ex-officio 2voting members. Members shall be broadly representative of the 3State's population in regard to developmental, physical, and 4mental disabilities, race, ethnic background, gender, and 5geographic location. Nine members shall be parents of children 6with disabilities between the ages of 3 and 21 years currently 7receiving special education services at public expense. Five 8members shall be individuals with disabilities, including one 9student or former student who is at least 18 years of age and 10no older than 21 years of age at the time of his or her 11appointment to the Council and who is receiving special 12education services at public expense or received those 13services at the time his or her high school program 14terminated. Within 30 days after the effective date of this 15amendatory Act of 1998, the Governor or his designee shall 16invite statewide organizations, being as inclusive as possible 17and based upon a reasonable inquiry, and Parent Training and 18Information Centers representing parents of children with 19disabilities, individuals with disabilities or both, to 20convene for the purpose of recommending to the Governor twice 21the number of individuals required to be appointed as members 22from each of the categories described in this paragraph, from 23which the Governor may appoint the 14 members of the Council 24who are parents of children with disabilities and individuals 25with disabilities. The 9 members who are parents of children 26with disabilities between the ages of 3 and 21 years receiving   SB1555 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10971 LNS 21053 b1special education services at public expense and the 5 members 2who are individuals with disabilities shall not be current 3full or part-time employees of school districts, special 4education cooperatives, regional service areas or centers, or 5any agency under the jurisdiction of any elected State 6official.7    In addition, the Governor shall appoint one regional 8superintendent of schools, one representative of an 9institution of higher education that prepares special 10education and related services personnel, one teacher of 11students with disabilities, one superintendent of a public 12school district, one director of a special education 13cooperative or special education administrator from a school 14district of less than 500,000 population, one representative 15of a public charter school, one representative of a private 16school serving children with disabilities, one representative 17of a vocational, community, or business organization that 18provides transition services to children with disabilities, 19and one at-large member from the general public. In addition, 20the Secretary of Human Services or his or her designee, the 21Director of Children and Family Services or his or her 22designee, the Director of Corrections or his or her designee, 23the Secretary of Early Childhood or his or her designee, and 24the Director of Special Education for the City of Chicago 25School District #299 or his or her designee shall serve as 26ex-officio voting members of the Council.  SB1555 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10971 LNS 21053 b1    All Council members shall be legal residents of the State 2of Illinois and shall be selected, as far as practicable, on 3the basis of their knowledge of, or experience in, the 4education of children with disabilities.5    The initial members to be appointed to the Council by the 6Governor under the provisions of this amendatory Act of 1998 7shall be appointed within 60 days after the effective date of 8that amendatory Act; provided that those persons who are 9serving as Council members on that effective date and who, as 10determined by the Governor after consultation with the State 11Board of Education, meet the requirements established by this 12amendatory Act for appointment to membership on the Council 13shall continue to serve as Council members until the 14completion of the remainder of their current terms. The 15initial members of the Council who are not Council members on 16the effective date of this amendatory Act of 1998 and who are 17appointed by the Governor under this amendatory Act of 1998 18shall by lot determine one-third of their number to serve for a 19term of 2 years (provided that person appointed as the student 20or former student member shall be included among those members 21who are to serve a term of 2 years), one-third of their number 22to serve for a term of 3 years, and one-third of their number 23to serve for a term of 4 years; provided, that if the total 24number of initial members so appointed by the Governor is not 25divisible into 3 whole numbers, all of the initial members so 26appointed shall by lot be assigned to 3 groups as follows: (i)   SB1555 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10971 LNS 21053 b1the members assigned to the first group, who shall include the 2student or former student member and who shall be equal in 3number to the number of members who are assigned to the second 4group, shall serve for a term of 2 years; (ii) the members 5assigned to the second group, who shall be equal in number to 6the number of members who are assigned to the first group, 7shall serve for a term of 3 years; and (iii) the members 8assigned to the third group, who shall comprise the remainder 9of the initial members so appointed by the Governor and whose 10number shall be either one more or one less than the number of 11members assigned to either the first group or second group, 12shall serve for a term of 4 years. Upon expiration of the term 13of office of a member of the Council who is not an ex-officio 14member, his or her successor shall be appointed by the 15Governor to serve for a term of 4 years, except that a 16successor appointed as the student or former student member 17shall be appointed to serve for a term of 2 years. Each member 18of the Council who is not an ex-officio member and whose term 19of office expires shall nevertheless continue to serve as a 20Council member until his or her successor is appointed. Each 21of the 4 ex-officio members of the Council shall continue to 22serve as a Council member during the period in which he or she 23continues to hold the office by reason of which he or she 24became an ex-officio member of the Council. The initial 25members of the Council who are not ex-officio members shall 26not, upon completion of their respective initial terms, be   SB1555 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 10971 LNS 21053 b1appointed to serve more than one additional consecutive term 2of 4 years, nor shall any successor member of the Council be 3appointed to serve more than 2 full consecutive 4-year terms; 4provided, that a person appointed as the student or former 5student member shall serve only one two-year term and shall 6not be reappointed to serve for an additional term. Vacancies 7in Council memberships held by parents of children with 8disabilities or individuals with disabilities may be filled 9from the original list of such parents and individuals 10recommended to the Governor. The Governor shall reconvene the 11group of organizations that provided the original list of 12parents of children with disabilities and individuals with 13disabilities when additional recommendations for those Council 14memberships are needed, but at a minimum the group shall be 15convened every 2 years for the purpose of updating the list of 16recommended parents or individuals. A vacancy in an appointed 17membership on the Council shall be filled for the unexpired 18balance of the term of that membership in the same manner that 19the original appointment for that membership was made.20    The terms of all persons serving as Advisory Council 21members on the effective date of this amendatory Act of 1998 22who are not determined by the Governor, after consultation 23with the State Board of Education, to meet the requirements 24established by this amendatory Act for appointment to initial 25membership on the Council shall terminate on the date that the 26Governor completes his appointments of the initial members of   SB1555 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 10971 LNS 21053 b1the Council under this amendatory Act, and the members of the 2Council as constituted under this amendatory Act shall take 3office and assume their powers and duties on that date.4    The Council as constituted under this amendatory Act of 51998 shall organize with a chairperson selected by the Council 6members and shall meet at the call of the chairperson upon 10 7days written notice but not less than 4 times a year. The 8Council shall establish such committees and procedures as it 9deems appropriate to carry out its responsibilities under this 10Act and the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 11Act.12    The State Board of Education shall designate an employee 13to act as executive secretary of the Council and shall furnish 14all professional and clerical assistance necessary for the 15performance of its duties.16    Members of the Council shall serve without compensation 17but shall be reimbursed for the necessary expenses incurred in 18the performance of their duties in accordance with the State 19Board of Education's Travel Control Policy.20(Source: P.A. 89-397, eff. 8-20-95; 89-507, eff. 7-1-97; 2190-644, eff. 7-24-98.) 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.